Massachusetts, session 194th, H1628.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 65 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “$2,500” in
line 5 and inserting in place thereof, the following word:- $10,000
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of section 65 of chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the word “$1,000” in line 13 and inserting in place thereof, the
following word:- $5,000
SECTION 3. Subsection (b) of section 65 of chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the word “$2,500” in line 14 and inserting in place thereof, the
following word:- $10,000
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 65A of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “$1,000” in line 7 and inserting in
place thereof, the following word:- $5,000
SECTION 5. Section 65A of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the word “$2,500” in line 8 and inserting in place thereof, the following
word:- $10,000
SECTION 6. Section 5 of chapter 141 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the first sentence and inserting in place thereof,
the following sentence:-
Any person, firm or corporation, or employee thereof, and any representative, member or
officer of such firm or corporation individually, entering upon or engaging in the business and
work hereinbefore defined, without having complied with this chapter, shall for the first offence
be punished by a fine not to exceed $5,000, and for a subsequent offence by a fine not to exceed
$10,000 or by imprisonment in the house of correction for six months, or both.
SECTION 7. Section 3L of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the words “five hundred” in line 31 and inserting
in place thereof, the following words:- "ten thousand"
of 2